Hawaii, session 2025, HB1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 46-20.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) Upon demand by the department of Hawaiian home lands, each county shall accept the license or dedication and ownership of any and all sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities servicing Hawaiian home lands and that are not subject to subsection (a), as may be identified by the department of Hawaiian home lands; provided that: (1)  Any sewer lines or other sewerage facilities: (A)  Not subject to subsection (a); (B)  Existing before [[]July 7, 2014[]]; and (C)  That the appropriate county determines are not in substantial compliance with environmental laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to the dedication or license of the sewers to the counties at the time of their construction, shall be brought into compliance with those laws, rules, and regulations by the department of Hawaiian home lands prior to acceptance by the county; provided that all sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities servicing Hawaiian home lands brought into compliance shall be accepted by a county within sixty days after the receipt by the appropriate county agency of a completed application for maintenance request; and (2)  Sewer transmission lines and other sewerage facilities completed after [[]July 7, 2014,[]] shall comply with all  applicable federal, state, and county environmental, design, and construction requirements prior to acceptance by a county." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST